Illinois, session 104th, HB2987.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Warehouse Tornado Preparedness Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Warehouse" means a building in which warehouse workers 8perform their duties and goods are stored in industries 9defined by any of the following North American Industry 10Classification System (NAICS) codes, however such building is 11denominated:12        (1) 493 for Warehousing and Storage;13        (2) 423 for Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods;14        (3) 424 for Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods;15        (4) 454110 for Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order 16    Houses; or17        (5) 492110 for Couriers and Express Delivery Services.18    "Warehouse worker" means any person who spends a majority 19of the person's working hours working within a warehouse, 20regardless of that person's status as an employee or 21independent contractor or the existence or non-existence of 22any employment relationship between the operator or owner of 23the warehouse. "Warehouse worker" does not include a person   HB2987 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09137 RPS 19193 b1who, due to the person's employment or any other reason, 2enters a warehouse irregularly, infrequently, or only for a 3short period of time. 4    Section 10. Tornado safety plan required. All operators of 5a warehouse within this State shall prepare a tornado safety 6plan for each warehouse they operate within 120 days after the 7effective date of this Act for each existing warehouse or, for 8warehouses opened on or after 120 days after the effective 9date of this Act, no later than 7 days after the warehouse 10becomes operational. Each plan shall be specific to the 11warehouse it was prepared for and must be reviewed and updated 12at least once per year or upon any significant change to the 13operations of the warehouse that affects the applicability or 14accuracy of the information in the plan. The operator of the 15warehouse should coordinate with the warehouse's local 16emergency services and disaster agency and fire department or 17fire protection district to create plans that, when 18implemented, will be consistent with the local jurisdiction's 19response activities. Copies of the plan and all updates made 20to the plan must be filed with the fire department or fire 21protection district in the jurisdiction in which the warehouse 22is located and the local emergency services and disaster 23agency in the jurisdiction in which the warehouse is located. 24The plan must, at a minimum, contain the following 25information:  HB2987 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09137 RPS 19193 b1        (1) A floor plan of the warehouse with emergency 2    exits, assembly points, shelter areas, and orienting 3    landmarks clearly displayed.4        (2) A written description of the actions that 5    employees and supervisors are required to perform in the 6    event of a tornado warning or other severe weather event.7        (3) A list of all emergency equipment stored in the 8    warehouse and the equipment's location and instructions on 9    the use of the equipment.10        (4) A written description of the actions that 11    employees and supervisors are required to perform in the 12    aftermath of a tornado or other severe weather event, 13    including basic first aid procedures and guidelines for 14    communications with other warehouse workers and first 15    responders. 16    Section 15. Inclement weather risk reduction. Warehouse 17facilities constructed after the effective date of this Act 18must provide the means, through modification, installation, or 19demonstration via rational analysis, to meet a life-safety 20performance level for tornado loading that is equivalent to, 21or exceeds, the life-safety performance level for the most 22onerous of other building code-prescribed extreme 23environmental loading events, such as hurricane, wind, 24earthquake, fire, and flood. The evaluation may incorporate 25statistical analyses of published data sets for extreme load   HB2987 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09137 RPS 19193 b1intensity versus probability of exceedance, such as ASCE/SEI 27-22 Appendix G; occupancy load; facility location; and 3building construction type and may follow non-prescriptive 4performance-based methods to achieve the desired level. In 5lieu of this risk-targeted approach, the evaluating design 6professional may elect to follow prescriptive methods as 7outlined in the Federal Emergency Management Agency standard 8P-431, Tornado Protection: Selecting Refuge Areas in Buildings 9and the Best Available Refuge Area Checklist to ensure that 10shelter areas designated in tornado safety plans are qualified 11as the best available refuge areas.  12    Section 90. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 135-1192 as follows: 14    (55 ILCS 5/5-1192 new)15    Sec. 5-1192. Building inspector requirements. 16    (a) In this Section, "building inspector" means (i) a 17State or county employee whose duties include the inspection 18or examination of structures or property in a county to 19determine if zoning or other code violations exist or (ii) a 20third party contracting with the county whose duties include 21the inspection or examination of structures or property in a 22county to determine if zoning or other code violations exist. 23"Building inspector" includes a code enforcement officer, as 24defined in Section 5-41005.  HB2987 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09137 RPS 19193 b1    (b) A building inspector who performs inspections or 2examinations under this Code must hold certification from the 3International Code Council in the area in which the inspector 4is inspecting or examining. The county must keep on file a copy 5of the certifications of the persons doing inspections or 6examinations on its behalf. A building inspector under this 7Section may have a grace period of one year from the date of 8hire to acquire the certification required under this Section.  9    Section 95. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 10changing Section 11-31.1-1 and by adding Section 11-31.1-1.5 11as follows: 12    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.1-1)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-31.1-1)13    Sec. 11-31.1-1. Definitions. As used in this Division, 14unless the context requires otherwise:15    (a) "Code" means any municipal ordinance, law, housing or 16building code or zoning ordinance that establishes 17construction, plumbing, heating, electrical, fire prevention, 18sanitation or other health and safety standards that are 19applicable to structures in a municipality or any municipal 20ordinance that requires, after notice, the cutting of weeds, 21the removal of garbage and debris, the removal of inoperable 22motor vehicles, or the abatement of nuisances from private 23property;24    (b) "Building inspector" means (i) a full time state,   HB2987 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09137 RPS 19193 b1county, or municipal employee whose duties include the 2inspection or examination of structures or property in a 3municipality to determine if zoning or other code violations 4exist or (ii) a third party contracting with the municipality 5whose duties include the inspection or examination of 6structures or property in a municipality to determine if 7zoning or other code violations exist;8    (c) "Property owner" means the legal or beneficial owner 9of a structure;10    (d) "Hearing officer" means a municipal employee or an 11officer or agent of a municipality, other than a building 12inspector or law enforcement officer, whose duty it is to: 13        (1) preside at an administrative hearing called to 14    determine whether or not a code violation exists; 15        (2) hear testimony and accept evidence from the 16    building inspector, the building owner and all interested 17    parties relevant to the existence of a code violation; 18        (3) preserve and authenticate the transcript and 19    record of the hearing and all exhibits and evidence 20    introduced at the hearing; 21        (4) issue and sign a written finding, decision and 22    order stating whether a code violation exists.23(Source: P.A. 91-162, eff. 7-16-99.) 24    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.1-1.5 new)25    Sec. 11-31.1-1.5. Building inspector requirements. A   HB2987 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09137 RPS 19193 b1building inspector who performs inspections or examinations 2under this Division must hold certification from the 3International Code Council in the area in which the inspector 4is inspecting or examining. The municipality must keep on file 5a copy of the certifications of the persons doing inspections 6or examinations on its behalf. A building inspector under this 7Section may have a grace period of one year from the date of 8hire to acquire the certification required under this Section. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law, except that Sections 90 and 95 takes effect on 11January 1, 2027.